Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5985.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) Beginning July 1, 2027, and by July 1, 2028, the University of Washington, in collaboration with Washington State University and other relevant stakeholders including individuals with direct lived experience with endometriosis, shall identify and make available materials and resources regarding endometriosis including information related to the awareness, incidence, and prevalence of endometriosis. This online resource center shall include, but is not limited to, best practices and evidence-based information for:(a) Detecting and diagnosing endometriosis;(b) Providing care for individuals with endometriosis;(c) Communicating with patients about endometriosis for health care professionals, health care-related organizations, and health systems; and(d) Other related topics determined by the University of Washington and Washington State University.(2) The University of Washington shall update the online resource center every three years and hold at least one stakeholder meeting during the process of updating the materials and resources for the online resource center.(3) This section expires December 31, 2031.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall incorporate information related to menstrual health, including differentiating between typical menstrual discomfort and severe symptoms that may require additional medical attention such as endometriosis, when revising the health and physical education state learning standards under RCW 28A.655.070.(2) This section expires June 30, 2029.--- END ---